Oklahoma, session 2025, SB751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 46.21b, as
amended by Section 16, Chapter 138, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 46.21b), is amended to read as follows:
Section 46.21b. A. An architect shall be required to plan,
design, and prepare plans and specifications for the following Code
Use Groups except where specifically exempt from the provisions of
the State Architectural and Licensed Interior Designers Act. All
Code Use Groups in this section are defined by the current
International Building Code.
B. The construction, addition, or alteration of a building of
any size or occupancy in the following Code Use Groups shall be
subject to the provisions of the State Architectural and Licensed
Interior Designers Act:
1. Code Use Group I - Institutional;

2. Code Use Group R-2 - Residential, limited to dormitories,
fraternities and sororities, and monasteries and convents;
3. Code Use Group A-1 - Assembly and theaters;
4. Code Use Group A-4 - Assembly, arenas and courts;
5. Code Use Group A-5 - Assembly, bleachers and grandstands;
6. Code Use Group H – High hazard; and
7. Buildings for which the designated Code Use Group changes
are not exempt from the State Architectural and Licensed Interior
Designers Act.
C. The following shall be exempt from the provisions of the
State Architectural and Licensed Interior Designers Act; provided
that, for the purposes of this subsection, a basement is not to be
counted as a story for the purpose of counting stories of a building
for height regulations:
1. The construction, addition, or alteration of a building no
more than two stories in height and with a code-defined occupancy of
no more than fifty (50) persons for the Code Use Groups A-2 and A-3
- Assembly and Code Use Group E - Education;
2. The construction, addition, or alteration of a building no
more than two stories in height and no more than sixty-four
transient lodging units per building for the Code Use Group R1 -
Residential, including, but not limited to, hotels and motels;
3. The construction, addition, or alteration of a building no
more than two stories in height and with a gross square footage not
exceeding one hundred thousand (100,000) in the Code Use Group B -
Business;
4. The construction, addition, or alteration of a building no
more than two stories in height and with a gross square footage not
exceeding two hundred thousand (200,000) in the Code Use Group M -
Mercantile; and
ENR. S. B. NO. 751 Page 2

5. The construction, addition, or alteration of a building no
more than two stories in height in the following Code Use Groups or
buildings:
a. Code Use Group U - Utility,
b. Code Use Group F - Factory and Industrial,
c. Code Use Group S - Storage,
d. Code Use Group R2 - Residential, including apartments
containing no more than thirty-two dwelling units or
thirty-two guest units per building,
e. Code Use Groups R3 and R4 - Residential,
f. all buildings used by a municipality, county, state,
public trust, public agency, or the federal government
with a construction value under One Hundred Fifty-
eight Thousand Dollars ($158,000.00) Three Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00),
g. incidental buildings or appurtenances associated with
paragraphs 1 through 5 of this subsection, and
h. all uninhabitable, privately owned agricultural
buildings.
D. The addition, renovation, or alteration of buildings where
the use was exempt as new construction shall remain exempt if the
Code Use Group does not change.
E. Upgrades, repairs, replacements, and changes made on
projects in Code Use Groups found in this title requiring an
architect are exempt from hiring an architect if the upgrades,
repairs, replacements, or changes do not affect the existing primary
structural, mechanical, or electrical systems, life safety systems,
fire codes, or exit passageways and/or or egress as determined by
the applicable building official having jurisdiction.
ENR. S. B. NO. 751 Page 3

F. Nonstructural interior construction projects in Code Use
Groups requiring an architect are exempt from hiring an architect if
the services are performed by a licensed interior designer.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 751 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 27th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 751 Page 5